Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.145

Educational materials regarding sex offenses, sex offenders, and victims of sexual assault.

(1) The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs, in consultation with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington state school directors' association, the association of Washington school principals, the center for children and youth justice, youthcare, the committee for children, the department of children, youth, and families, the department of social and health services, the office of crime victims advocacy, other relevant organizations, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall by June 1, 2014, update existing educational materials made available throughout the state to inform parents, students, school districts, and other interested community members about:

(a) The laws related to sex offenses, including the legal elements of sex offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is a victim, the consequences upon conviction, and sex offender registration, community notification, and the classification of sex offenders based on an assessment of the risk of reoffending;

(b) How to recognize behaviors characteristic of sex offenses and sex offenders;

(c) How to prevent victimization, particularly that of young children;

(d) How to take advantage of community resources for victims of sexual assault;

(e) How to prevent children from being recruited into sex trafficking; and

(f) Other information as deemed appropriate.

(2) By September 1, 2014, and biennially thereafter, the Washington coalition of sexual assault programs, in consultation with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall review and update the educational materials developed under subsection (1) of this section to assure that they remain current and accurate, and are age-appropriate for a variety of ages.

(3) Every public school that offers sexual health education must assure that sexual health education complies with existing requirements in the January 2005 guidelines for sexual health information and disease prevention developed by the department of health and the superintendent of public instruction. Specifically, sexual health education must attempt to achieve the objective "take responsibility for and understand the consequences of their own behavior" and the objective "avoid exploitive or manipulative relationships." To do this, sexual health education programs should include age-appropriate information about the legal elements of sex offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is a victim and the consequences upon conviction, as well as the other information required to be included in informational materials prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Public schools that offer sexual health education are encouraged to incorporate the materials developed under subsection (1) of this section into the curriculum.

[ 2023 c 470 s 1004. Prior: 2013 c 85 s 1; 2013 c 10 s 3; 2006 c 135 s 2.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Finding—2013 c 10: See note following RCW 28A.410.035.